Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 6. Nature of and Assignment of Partnership Interests.

Sec. 32.11.320.
Nature of partnership interest.

The interest of a partner, whether or not transferable, is personal property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 25 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the section which read, “A partnership interest is personal property.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 863.

Partnership interests as securities within meaning of Federal Securities Act of 1933 (15 USCS §§ 77a et seq.) and Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78a et seq.). 58 ALR Fed. 408.

Sec. 32.11.330.
Assignment of partnership interest.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise the rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner upon assignment of all of the partner’s partnership interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.340.
Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This chapter does not deprive a partner of the benefit of an exemption law applicable to the partner’s partnership interest.

This section provides the exclusive remedy that a judgment creditor of a general or limited partner or of the general or limited partner’s assignee may use to satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s interest in the partnership. Other legal or equitable remedies, including foreclosure on the general or limited partner’s partnership interest and a court order for directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor general or limited partner might have made, are not available to the judgment creditor attempting to satisfy the judgment out of the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited partnership and may not be ordered by a court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 1 SLA 2000; am § 38 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 9, 2013, in (b), inserted “legal or equitable” near the beginning of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 1, SLA 2000 provides that (b) of this section, added by sec. 3, ch. 1, SLA 2000, “does not apply to the remedies available to a judgment creditor for collecting a judgment entered by a court before March 8, 2000.”

Sec. 32.11.350.
Right of assignee to become limited partner.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that

the assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in the partnership agreement; or

all other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this chapter. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of the assignee’s assignor to make and return contributions as provided in AS

32.11.200

—

32.11.310

. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time the assignee became a limited partner.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from the assignor’s liability to the limited partnership under AS

32.11.070

and

32.11.210

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am §§ 15, 16 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3(b), ch. 128, SLA 1992 provides that this section “does not apply to a limited partnership assignment unless the assignment is made after July 1, 1993.”

Under § 22(b), ch. 87, SLA 1994, the 1994 amendment to (a) and (b) of this section by §§ 15 and 16, ch. 87, SLA 1994 apply only to limited partnership assignments made after June 7, 1994.

Sec. 32.11.360.
Power of estate of deceased or incompetent partner.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges the partner to be incompetent to manage the partner’s person or the partner’s property, the partner’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all of the partner’s rights for the purpose of settling the partner’s estate or administering the partner’s property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)